Washington statutes.
RCW 26.44.130

Arrest without warrant.

When a peace officer responds to a call alleging that a child has been subjected to sexual or physical abuse or criminal mistreatment and has probable cause to believe that a crime has been committed or responds to a call alleging that a temporary restraining order or preliminary injunction has been violated, the peace officer has the authority to arrest the person without a warrant pursuant to RCW 10.31.100.

[ 2002 c 219 s 11; 1988 c 190 s 4.]

NOTES:

Intent—Finding—2002 c 219: See note following RCW 9A.42.037.